District of Columbia statutes.
16-4502

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-200, § 2, 30 DCR 125
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 2, 32 DCR 30
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(c) 48 DCR 2214
1981 Ed., § 16-4502.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon §  2 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act.